Florida, session 2026, SB20.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 193 194 Section 1.âThe facts stated in the preamble to this act are 195 found and declared to be true. 196 Section 2.âThe sum of $14,926,639.56 is appropriated from 197 the General Revenue Fund to the Department of Children and 198 Families for the relief of H.H. for injuries and damages 199 sustained as a result of the departmentâs negligence. 200 Section 3.âThe Chief Financial Officer is directed to draw 201 a warrant in favor of H.H., payable to an irrevocable trust 202 created for the exclusive use and benefit of H.H., in the sum of 203 $14,926,639.56 upon funds of the Department of Children and 204 Families in the State Treasury and to pay the same out of such 205 funds in the State Treasury. 206 Section 4.âIt is the intent of the Legislature that all 207 government liens, including Medicaid liens, resulting from the 208 treatment and care of H.H. for the occurrences described in this 209 act be waived and paid by the state. 210 Section 5.âThe amount paid by the Department of Children 211 and Families pursuant to s. 768.28, Florida Statutes, and the 212 amount awarded under this act are intended to provide the sole 213 compensation for all present and future claims arising out of 214 the factual situation described in this act which resulted in 215 injuries and damages to H.H. The total amount paid for attorney 216 fees relating to this claim may not exceed 25 percent of the 217 total amount awarded under this act. 218 Section 6.âThis act shall take effect upon becoming a law.